Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-159] Advertising. (a) A
course shall not be advertised as an approved course for continuing education
credit unless the commissioner has approved the course in writing.

(b) Advertisements for an approved course
shall include:

(1) The provider's name, course title, and course
number;

(2) The statement "Approved by the Hawaii State
Insurance Commissioner for continuing education credit";

(3) The number of approved credit hours; and

(4) The amount of tuition, fees, and all other
associated expenses. [L 2003, c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next